Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
State Police Retirement System
16.584.
Employer pay credits for members in hybrid cash balance plan — Report — Reduction of accumulated sick leave — Funding in executive branch budget. [Effective April 1, 2023]

Subject to the limitations and requirements provided by this section, the following shall apply to members of the State Police Retirement System who are eligible for benefits from the hybrid cash balance plan established by KRS

16.583

:

Within thirty (30) days following the close of each fiscal year ending on or after June 30, 2023, members participating in the State Police Retirement System in the hybrid cash balance plan who have five (5) or more years of service credited under KRS 16.543(1), 61.543(1), and 78.615(1), shall receive an employer pay credit under KRS

16.583

(2)(b)2. equal to an amount determined by multiplying the member’s hours of accumulated sick leave in excess of four hundred eighty (480) hours as of the most recently completed fiscal year by the member’s hourly base pay determined under KRS

16.052

, including any annual adjustments provided by KRS

16.052

(6). The member’s hourly base pay shall not include any payments for overtime or any salary supplement received from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program established pursuant to KRS

15.410

to

15.510

; and

Effective July 1, 2023, members with an account in the hybrid cash balance plan who retire from the State Police Retirement System shall receive an employer pay credit under KRS 16.583(2)(b)2. equal to an amount determined by multiplying the member’s hours of accumulated sick leave upon termination of employment by the member’s hourly base pay determined under KRS 16.052, including any annual adjustments provided by KRS 16.052(6). The member’s hourly base pay shall not include any payments for overtime or any salary supplement received from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program established pursuant to KRS

15.410

to

15.510

.

The Department of Kentucky State Police shall report the information required by the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority to carry out the provisions of this section and shall reduce the member’s accumulated sick leave by the amount of sick leave converted to an employer pay credit pursuant to this section.

The provisions of KRS 16.583(2)(b)2. and this section are subject to funding for the benefit in the executive branch budget. In the event funding for this additional employer credit is not provided in the executive branch budget, no employer credits for accumulated sick leave shall be provided during the period the budget is effective.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 181, § 3, effective April 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/1/2023). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 181, sec. 10, reads as follows: “n the event that budgeted funds in fiscal year 2023-2024 of the executive branch budget are insufficient to fund the program established by subsection (2)(b)2. of Section 2 of this Act and Section 3 of this Act [this statute] for that fiscal year, the program shall, notwithstanding any provision of Section 3 [this statute] to the contrary, still be provided in fiscal year 2023-2024 and any additional funding needed for the benefits provided in fiscal year 2023-2024 shall be included in the employer contribution rates payable for fiscal years occurring on or after July 1, 2024.”

16.585.
Normal retirement. [Repealed.]

16.586.
Partial disability, what constitutes. [Repealed.]

16.590.
Vested deferred benefits. [Repealed.]

16.591.
Partial disability allowances — Exception. [Repealed.]

16.595.
Delayed allowance. [Repealed.]

16.596.
Medical examinations after disability retirement [Repealed.]

16.598.
Hazardous disability retirement benefits. [Repealed.]

16.600.
Death in line of duty. [Repealed.]

16.601.
Death in the line of duty — Payments to surviving spouse, dependent children, and designated beneficiaries — Election — Receipt of benefits under KRS 16.578 pending final determination.

If a member dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

and is survived by a spouse:

The surviving spouse shall be the beneficiary, and this shall supersede the designation of all previous beneficiaries of the deceased member’s retirement account except as provided in KRS 61.542(2)(e);

The surviving spouse, provided he or she supersedes all previously designated beneficiaries, may elect to receive a lump-sum payment of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and a monthly payment equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the member’s monthly average pay beginning in the month following the member’s death and continuing each month until the death of the surviving spouse; and

In addition, if the member is also survived by dependent children, monthly payments shall be made for each dependent child equal to ten percent (10%) of the deceased member’s monthly average pay, except that the combined maximum payment made to the:

Surviving spouse and dependent children under this subsection shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the deceased member’s monthly average pay; and

Dependent children, while the surviving spouse is living, shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the deceased member’s monthly average pay. Payments made to the dependent children under this subsection shall be divided equally among all the dependent children.

If a member dies as a result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

and is not survived by a spouse but is survived by a dependent child or children, the following benefits shall be paid to the dependent child or children:

Fifty percent (50%) of the deceased member’s monthly average pay, if the deceased member has one (1) dependent child;

Sixty-five percent (65%) of the deceased member’s monthly average pay, if the deceased member has two (2) dependent children; or

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the deceased member’s monthly average pay, if the deceased member has three (3) or more dependent children.

Payments made to the dependent children under this subsection shall be divided equally among all the dependent children.

If a member dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS

16.505

and the member has on file in the retirement office at the time of his or her death a written designation of only one (1) beneficiary other than his or her spouse who has not been superseded by the surviving spouse as provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, and who is a dependent receiving at least one-half (1/2) of his or her support from the deceased member, the beneficiary may elect to receive a lump-sum payment of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The payments provided by this section shall commence in the month following the date of death of the member and shall be payable to the spouse, dependent children, beneficiaries, or to a legally appointed guardian or as directed by the system. Benefits to a dependent child under this section shall be payable notwithstanding an election by a surviving spouse or beneficiary to withdraw the deceased member’s accumulated account balance as provided in KRS

61.625

or to elect benefits under any other provisions of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

.

A surviving spouse or beneficiary eligible for benefits under subsection (1) or (3) of this section who is also eligible for benefits under any other provisions of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

may elect benefits under this section or any other section of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

but cannot elect to receive both.

A surviving spouse or beneficiary applying for benefits under subsection (1) or (3) of this section who is also eligible for benefits under KRS

16.578

may elect to receive benefits under KRS

16.578

(2)(a) or (b) while the application for benefits under subsection (1) or (3) of this section is pending.

If a final determination results in a finding of eligibility for benefits under subsection (1) or (3) of this section, the system shall recalculate the benefits due the surviving spouse or beneficiary in accordance with this subsection.

If the surviving spouse or beneficiary has been paid less than the amount of benefits to which the surviving spouse or beneficiary was entitled to receive under this section, the system shall pay the additional funds due to the surviving spouse or beneficiary.

If the surviving spouse or beneficiary has been paid more than the amount of benefits to which the surviving spouse or beneficiary was entitled to receive under this section, the system shall deduct the amount overpaid to the surviving spouse or beneficiary from the ten thousand dollars ($10,000) lump-sum payment and from the monthly retirement allowance payments until the amount owed to the systems has been recovered.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 91, § 14; 1968, ch. 25, § 6; 1972, ch. 116, § 76; 1974, ch. 128, § 9, effective March 26, 1974; 1976, ch. 321, § 40; 1978, ch. 311, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 240, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 167, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 385, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 176, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2013, ch. 120, § 42, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 114, § 1, effective April 13, 2016; 2018 ch. 107, § 24, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 151, § 2, effective April 13, 2018; 2020 ch. 46, § 1, effective March 27, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/27/2020). KRS

16.601

and

61.621

were amended in 2020 Ky. Acts ch. 46, secs. 1 and 2, respectively. Section 3 of that Act reads as follows:

“Notwithstanding KRS

16.505

to

16.652

,

61.510

to

61.705

,

78.510

to

78.852

,

161.220

to

161.716

, or any provision of Section 1 or 2 of this Act to the contrary:

In the month following the effective date of this Act, the surviving spouse, if the spouse is receiving a monthly benefit due to a member's death that was determined by the systems to be a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505(19) or whose death resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 2 of this Act, and who following the member's death has subsequently remarried prior to the effective date of this Act and had their retirement benefit reduced due to remarriage, shall have his or her monthly benefit increased to the amount specified by Section 1 or 2 of this Act, as applicable, as if the remarriage had occurred after the effective date of this Act, except that the amount shall not be increased above a level that exceeds one hundred percent (100%) of the member's monthly average pay when combined with any dependent child payments from the systems.

In the month following the effective date of the Act, the surviving spouse of a member whose death was determined by the systems to be a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505(19) or whose death resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 2 of this Act, but who chose to receive lifetime monthly benefits otherwise payable under KRS

16.578

or

61.640

in lieu of the benefits payable under subsection (1) of Section 1 of this Act or subsection (3) of Section 2 of this Act, shall have his or her monthly benefit increased to the amount specified by Section 1 or 2 of this Act, as applicable, except that the amount shall not be increased above a level that exceeds one hundred percent (100%) of the member's monthly average pay when combined with any dependent child payments from the systems.

The Kentucky Retirement Systems shall establish by administrative regulation a process by which a surviving spouse of a member who died prior to retirement and prior to April 13, 2018, may apply for the death benefits established by Section 1 and 2 of this Act, provided the surviving spouse:

Is currently receiving a monthly benefit from the systems;

Did not prior to April 13, 2018, seek a determination by the systems of whether or not the death was a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505(19) or resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 2; and

Submits an application developed by the systems on or before January 1, 2021

In the month following the effective date of this Act, the surviving spouse, if the spouse is receiving a monthly benefit due to a member's death that was determined by the systems to be a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505(19) or whose death resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 2 of this Act, and who following the member's death subsequently remarried prior to April 13, 2018, shall have his or her monthly benefit increased to the amount specified by Section 1 or 2 of the Act, as applicable, except that the amount shall not be increased above a level that exceeds one hundred percent (100%) of the member's monthly average pay when combined with any dependent child payments from the systems.”

If the systems determines the death was a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505(19) or resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 2 of this Act, then in the month following the determination, the systems shall adjust the surviving spouse monthly benefits prospectively in accordance with Section 1 or 2 of this Act except that the amount shall not be increased above a level that exceeds one hundred percent (100%) of the members monthly average pay when combined with any dependent child payments from the systems.

(3/27/2020). KRS

16.601

and

61.621

were amended in 2020 Ky. Acts ch. 46, secs. 1 and 2, respectively. Section 4 of that Act reads as follows:

“The provisions of Sections 1 to 3 of this Act shall not reduce any benefits payable to any surviving spouse or dependent children of a member who died prior to the effective date of this Act and whose death was determined by the systems to be the direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505(19) or resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 2 of this Act.”

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 ( 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

(4/13/2018). This statute was amended in
2018 Ky. Acts ch. 151, sec. 2. Section 8 of that Act reads as follows:

“Notwithstanding
KRS

16.505

to

16.652

,

61.510

to

61.705

,

78.510

to

78.852

,

161.220

to

161.716

, or any provision of Sections 1 to 7 of this Act to the contrary, the Kentucky Retirement Systems shall provide the following benefit adjustments to surviving spouses and dependent children of those members who died prior to the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018] and whose death was determined by the systems to be a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in subsection (19) of Section 1 of this Act [ KRS

16.505

] or whose death resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 5 of this Act [ KRS

61.621

]:

(1) In the month following the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018], the surviving spouse, if the spouse is receiving a monthly benefit due to a member's death, shall have his or her monthly benefit increased to the amount specified by Section 2 or 5 of this Act [this statute or
KRS

61.621

], as applicable, except that the amount shall not be increased above a level that exceeds 100 percent of the member's monthly average pay when combined with any dependent child payments from the systems;

(2) In the month following the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018], any dependent child who is receiving a monthly benefit due to a member's death shall have his or her monthly benefit increased to the amount specified by Section 2 or 5 of this Act [this statute or
KRS

61.621

], as applicable, if the member was not married at the time of death;

(3) In the month following the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018], a surviving spouse who was married to the deceased member at the time of death but who was ineligible for monthly benefits payable to the surviving spouse under
KRS

16.601

as codified prior to the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018], shall receive the monthly benefit payable to the surviving spouse in Section 2 of this Act [this statute], provided the member's death occurred on or after January 1, 2017; and

(4) In the month following the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018], any surviving spouse and any dependent child of a deceased member who is receiving a monthly benefit shall be eligible for the health benefits specified by Section 6 of this Act [ KRS

61.702

].

The provisions of this section shall only be construed to provide benefit adjustments to surviving spouses and dependent children of those members who died prior to the effective date of this Act [April 13, 2018] and only in situations where the member's death was determined by the systems to be the direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in subsection (19) of Section 1 of this Act [ KRS

16.505

] or resulted from a duty-related injury as defined in Section 5 of this Act [ KRS

61.621

].”

16.605.
Total and permanent disability in line of duty. [Repealed.]

16.610.
Partial disability in line of duty. [Repealed.]

16.615.
Death not in line of duty. [Repealed.]

16.620.
Disability not in line of duty. [Repealed.]

16.625.
Benefit reductions. [Repealed.]

16.630.
Death benefits after age 55. [Repealed.]

16.635.
Optional benefits. [Repealed.]

16.640.
Administration of system.

The government and control of the system is hereby vested in the board of trustees of the Kentucky Retirement Systems. The board shall carry out the provisions of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

in the same manner in which it administers the Kentucky Employees Retirement System. In all matters concerning the administration of KRS

16.510

to

16.652

, the same rights, duties, and obligations shall apply to the board, as now apply under the provisions of KRS

61.510

to

61.692

, except that members of the board, when acting for the State Police Retirement System, shall be paid a per diem of thirty dollars ($30) plus actual expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 28; 1960, ch. 165, Part I, § 8; 1964, ch. 91, § 16; 1972, ch. 116, § 15; 1976, ch. 321, § 40; 1978, ch. 384, § 536, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 186, § 22, effective July 15, 1980; 2000, ch. 385, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

Although this section is included in Acts 1980, ch. 186, the proposed change was deleted by committee amendment.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Eligible members of the Board of Trustees of the Kentucky Retirement Systems may receive per diem payments from each of the three state retirement systems providing they have acted for each of those systems at a particular board meeting and such is specifically reflected in the minutes thereof.

OAG 80-10

.

16.642.
Board is trustee of funds — Investments — Control over assets in custodial account — Priority to investments enhancing economic Welfare of Commonwealth — Investment committee of funds — Cap on amount of assets managed by any one investment manager.

The board shall be the trustee of funds created by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

and KRS

61.701

and shall have full power to invest and reinvest such assets in accordance with federal law.

The board, through adopted written policies, shall maintain ownership and control over its assets held in its unitized managed custodial account.

The board, in keeping with its responsibility as trustee and wherever feasible, shall give priority to the investment of funds in obligations calculated to improve the industrial development and enhance the economic welfare of the Commonwealth.

The investment committee established pursuant to KRS

61.650

shall serve as the investment committee of the funds established by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

.

Based upon market value at the time of purchase, the board shall limit the amount of assets managed by any one (1) active or passive investment manager to fifteen 5 percent (15%) of the assets in the pension and insurance funds.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 33, § 7; 1972, ch. 116, § 16; 1974, ch. 128, § 10, effective March 26, 1974; 1976, ch. 321, § 40; 1988, ch. 349, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 2003, ch. 169, § 2, effective March 31, 2003; 2004, ch. 36, § 5, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 127, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 173, §
2, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 102, § 75, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 247 instructs the Reviser of Statutes to adjust KRS references throughout the statutes to conform with the 2006 renumbering of the Financial Services Code, KRS Chapter 286. Such an adjustment has been made in this statute.

16.645.
Matters not specified in KRS 16.510 to 16.652.

The following subjects shall be administered in the same manner subject to the same limitations and requirements as provided for the Kentucky Employees Retirement System as follows:

Cessation of membership, as provided for by KRS

61.535

;

Medical examiners and hearing procedures, as provided for by KRS

61.665

;

Actuarial bases, as provided for by KRS

61.670

;

Duties of the employer, as provided for by KRS

61.675

;

Exemption of benefits of the system for taxation and qualified domestic relations orders, as provided for by KRS

61.690

;

Retirement allowance increase, as provided for by KRS

61.691

;

Calculation of retirement allowance, as provided for by KRS

61.599

;

Beneficiaries to be designated by member, change, rights, as provided for by KRS

61.542

;

Year of service credit, as provided for by KRS

61.545

;

Refund of contributions, death after retirement, as provided by KRS

61.630

;

Custodian of fund, payments made, when, as provided for by KRS

61.660

;

Credit for service prior to membership date, as provided for by KRS

61.526

;

Member’s account, confidential, as provided for by KRS

61.661

;

Cessation of membership, loss of benefits, as provided for by KRS

61.550

;

Correction of errors in records, as provided for by KRS

61.685

;

Maximum disability benefit, as provided for by KRS

61.607

;

Retirement application procedure, effective retirement date, as provided for by KRS

61.590

;

Employer contributions, as provided for by KRS

61.565

;

Reinstatement of lost service credit, purchase of service credit, service for Armed Forces, interest paid, and delayed contribution and installment payments, as provided for by KRS

61.552

;

Reciprocal arrangement between systems, as provided by KRS

61.680

;

Refund of contributions, conditions, as provided by KRS

61.625

;

Hospital and medical insurance plan, as provided by KRS

61.702

;

Death benefit, as provided by KRS

61.705

;

Disability retirement allowance, reduction, and discontinuance, as provided by KRS

61.615

;

Reinstated employee, contributions on creditable compensation, as provided for by KRS

61.569

;

Statement to be made under oath, good faith reliance, as provided for in KRS

61.699

;

Retirement of persons in hazardous positions, as provided for by KRS

61.592

;

Direct deposit of recipient’s retirement allowance as provided in KRS

61.623

;

Payment of small amounts upon death of member, retiree, or recipient without formal administration of the estate as provided in KRS

61.703

;

Suspension of retirement payments on reemployment, reinstatement, recomputation of allowance, waiver of provisions in certain instances, reemployment in a different position, as provided for by KRS

61.637

;

Medical examination and financial review after disability retirement, staff review, as provided in KRS

61.610

; and

Employer payment of increases in creditable compensation and adjustments to creditable compensation during the last five (5) years of employment as provided by KRS

61.598

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 94, § 29; 1972, ch. 116, § 17; 1974, ch. 128, § 11; 1976, ch. 321, § 10, 40; 1978, ch. 311, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 423, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 90, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 349, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 346, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 240, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 105, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 385, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 7, § 9, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 52, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 169, § 3, effective March 31, 2003; 2004, ch. 36, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 77, § 28, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 148, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 120, § 43, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 125, § 10, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 41, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 102, § 34, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

16.647.
Custodian of fund — Payments made, when. [Repealed.]

16.650.
Recomputation of benefits in 1972. [Repealed.]

16.651.
Recomputation of benefits in 1968. [Repealed.]

16.652.
Benefits not to be reduced or impaired for members who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Exceptions — Amendment of benefits and rights. [Declared void — See LRC Note Below]

For members who begin participating in the State Police Retirement System prior to January 1, 2014, it is hereby declared that in consideration of the contributions by the member, and in further consideration of benefits received by the state from the member’s employment, KRS

16.510

to

16.645

shall constitute an inviolable contract of the Commonwealth, and the benefits provided therein shall not be subject to reduction or impairment by alteration, amendment or repeal, except:

As provided in KRS

6.696

; and

The General Assembly reserves the right to amend, reduce, or suspend any legislative changes to the provisions of KRS

16.505

to

16.652

that become effective on or after July 1, 2018.

For members who begin participating in the State Police Retirement System on or after January 1, 2014, the General Assembly reserves the right to amend, suspend, or reduce the benefits and rights provided under KRS

16.505

to

16.652

if, in its judgment, the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands, except that the amount of benefits the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction shall not be affected.

For purposes of this subsection, the amount of benefits the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction shall be limited to the accumulated account balance the member has accrued at the time of amendment, suspension, or reduction.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to limit the General Assembly’s authority to change any other benefit or right specified by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

, for members who begin participating in the State Police Retirement System on or after January 1, 2014, except the benefits specified by paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the General Assembly’s authority to amend, reduce, or suspend the benefits and rights of members of the State Police Retirement System as provided by KRS

16.505

to

16.652

that the General Assembly had the authority to amend, reduce, or suspend, prior to July 1, 2013.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 116, § 19; 1978, ch. 384, § 537, effective June 17, 1978; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 75, effective September 16, 1993; 1996, ch. 167, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 120, § 44, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 32, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

In light of the contractual obligation created by this section, the General Assembly may now limit retirement benefits to a certain maximum percentage of final annual salary only prospectively as to present nonretired and future members of the retirement plan.

OAG 78-4

.

The General Assembly could enact legislation guaranteeing members of this retirement system only the amount each has contributed toward his retirement benefits but such legislation may not have retroactive effect.

OAG 78-4

.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), contained an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89, and 90, §§ 1 — 84 of the Act should become effective two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows: “within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within 150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993; “within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.